Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB42.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Well Operation Response Team Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Completion." The date on which a well involved is properly equipped for the production of oil or gas, goes into production or, if a well is dry, the date on which the well is abandoned."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Drilling." The term includes the drilling or redrilling of 123456789101112131415161718 a well or the deepening or expansion of an existing well."Exploration." A drilling effort to obtain information relating to oil or gas extraction without the intent of immediate production."Operator." An individual or entity that locates, drills, operates, alters, directs, controls, supervises, maintains, plugs or abandons a well or reconditions a well with the purpose of production."Production." The retrieval of oil or gas from a well."Response team." A team of individuals established by an operator in accordance with this act, the members of which, at a minimum:(1) Are familiar with the operations and equipment of a well.(2) Participate at least annually in response training at a minimum of one well that is operated by the operator and covered by the response team.(3) Are trained in basic first aid and CPR on an annual basis.(4) Will be available with respect to the well involved no later than one hour by ground travel time after requested."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Well." A bore hole drilled or being drilled onshore for the purpose of, or to be used for, producing, extracting or injecting any gas, petroleum or other liquid related to oil or gas production or storage, including a hole drilled or being drilled for exploration. The term does not include a hole that has been plugged and abandoned.Section 3. Response team regulations.20250HB0042PN0021 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duty of secretary.--No later than 18 months after the effective date of this subsection, the secretary shall promulgate regulations, in accordance with this section, relating to response teams.(b) Requirements.--Regulations promulgated under subsection (a) shall:(1) Not be construed to waive operator training requirements applicable to existing response teams.(2) Establish, subject to update every five years thereafter, criteria to certify the qualifications of response teams.(3) Require that the operator of a well:(i) During the exploration or drilling phase, or before the completion phase:(A) Have an employee knowledgeable in responding to emergency situations that may arise at the well who is employed and present at the well at all times.(B) Make available a certified response team.(ii) During the production phase, make available a certified response team.(4) Provide that an operator must select one of the following to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (3)(ii):(i) A multiemployer composite response team that is made up of team members who are knowledgeable about the operations of the well and who train on an annual basis at the well:(A) Which provides coverage for multiple operators that have team members which include at least two active employees from each of the operators.20250HB0042PN0021 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Which provides coverage for multiple wells owned by the same operator.(C) Which is a State-sponsored response team that is composed of at least two active employees from each of the operators.(ii) A commercial response team that is provided for through contract with a third-party vendor or a response team provided by another operator, if the team:(A) Trains on a quarterly basis at a minimum of one well operated by the operator who contracted for the services of the commercial response team.(B) Is knowledgeable about the operations of the wells that are covered under the contract for services.(C) Is composed of individuals with a minimum of one year well experience that has occurred within the five-year period preceding their employment on the contract response team.(iii) A State-sponsored response team made up of State employees.(5) Require that an operator of a well:(i) Within 15 minutes of the commencement of an emergency, contact local first responders to inform them of the emergency.(ii) Within one hour of the commencement of an emergency, contact the department to inform it of the emergency.(iii) Within one hour of the commencement of an emergency, contact a State response center.(iv) Provide communication technology, within a 20250HB0042PN0021 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable distance of the well, that enables the operator to comply with the regulations under this paragraph.(6) Require that an operator provide annual training to local first responders responsible for serving the area of each well operated by the operator, who may be required to respond to an emergency situation, on the hazards of a well and proper emergency response techniques.(7) Require that an operator file a report, on an annual basis, with the department that provides detailed information on the response team assigned to each well of the operator and affirmatively states that the operator is in compliance with this act and all regulations promulgated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0042PN0021 - 5 - 123456789101112131415